Hawaii statutes.
[§346F-2] Findings and
declaration of necessity. It is the intent of the legislature to establish
a special fund within the state treasury to receive revenue from the nursing
facility sustainability fee to be administered by the department, which shall use
the revenue from the fee and associated federal medicaid matching funds to make
payments to nursing facilities and for other purposes as set forth in this
chapter. [L 2012, c 156, pt of §2, §5; am L 2013, c 142, §§2(1), 3; am L 2014,
c 124, §2; am L 2015, c 69, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next